Maryland, session 2025, HB1366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–861.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SURVEILLANCE TEST” MEANS AN ANNUAL
SCREENING USING:
(1) CA–125 SERUM TUMOR MARKER TESTING;
(2) TRANSVAGINAL ULTRASOUND; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1366*

HOUSE BILL 1366
(3) A PELVIC EXAMINATION.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION:
(I) SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR CERVICAL SMEAR OR PAP
TEST FOR AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE;
(II) SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR SURVEILLANCE TESTS FOR
OVARIAN CANCER FOR AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE THAT:
1. HAS AT LEAST ONE FIRST–DEGREE RELATIVE WITH
OVARIAN CANCER OR CLUSTER OF RELATIVES WITH BREAST OR NONPOLYPOSIS
COLORECTAL CANCER; OR
2. HAS TESTED POSITIVE FOR THE BRCA1 OR BRCA2
GENE MUTATION; AND
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, MAY
NOT IMPOSE A COPAYMENT, COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT ON
COVERAGE DESCRIBED IN ITEMS (I) AND (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(2) IF AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN, AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. § 223, AN ENTITY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY SUBJECT THE COVERAGE DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) AND (II) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE DEDUCTIBLE
REQUIREMENT OF THE HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.

HOUSE BILL 1366 3
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.